Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Division 2. Contracts for Construction of Irrigation Works

§ 36-7-320.
Duty to contract; contents; withdrawal of land and filing of bond necessary.

Upon the withdrawal of the land by the department of the interior, it shall be the duty of the board to enter into a contract with the parties submitting the proposal, which contract shall contain complete specifications of the location, dimensions, character and estimated cost of the proposed ditch, canal or other irrigation work; the price and terms per acre at which such works and perpetual water rights shall be sold to settlers; the price and terms upon which the state is to dispose of the land to settlers; provided, that such price and terms for irrigation works, water rights and for lands to be disposed of by the state to settlers shall, in all cases, be reasonable and just. This contract shall not be entered into on the part of the state until the withdrawal of these lands by the department of the interior and the filing of a satisfactory bond on the part of the proposed contractor for irrigation works, which bond shall be in a penal sum equal to five percent (5%) of the estimated cost of the works, and to be conditioned for the faithful performance of the provisions of the contract with the state.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 13; R.S. 1899, § 946; C.S. 1910, § 672; C.S. 1920, § 783; R.S. 1931, § 91-715; C.S. 1945, § 24-413; W.S. 1957, § 36-100.

Cross references. —

As to public works and contracts, see §

16-6-101

et seq.

As to irrigation generally, see chapter 5 of title 41.

Right to contract for surplus water. —

If reservoir has sufficient capacity above that required to satisfy contractual rights of owners of land in original project, reservoir owner has right to contract with others for use of storage water. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

§ 36-7-321.
Terms.

No contract shall be made by the board which requires a greater time than five (5) years for the construction of the canal, works or irrigation system, and all contracts shall be conditioned that active construction work shall begin within six (6) months from the date of the contract, and that at least one-tenth of the construction work shall be completed within one (1) year of the date of the contract; that at least one-third of the construction work shall be completed within two (2) years from the date of the contract, and that construction shall be prosecuted diligently and continuously to completion; and that a cessation of work under the contract with the state for a period of ninety (90) days during the months of May, June, July, August, September, October and November, after the second year will forfeit to the state all rights under the said contract.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 14; R.S. 1899, § 947; Laws 1909, ch. 160, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 673; C.S. 1920, § 784; R.S. 1931, § 91-716; C.S. 1945, § 24-414; W.S. 1957, § 36-101.

Invalid contract. —

Contract by which company which obtained license from board to construct irrigation works gave to third party exclusive right to contract with settlers for perpetual water rights within a fixed cost range was contrary to law and against public policy. McKinney v. Big Horn Basin Development Co., 167 F. 770, 1909 U.S. App. LEXIS 4379 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1909).

§ 36-7-322.
Notice upon failure to fulfill; sale of incompleted works; option to complete.

Upon the failure of any parties, having contracts with the state for the construction of irrigation works, to begin the same within the time specified by the contract, or to complete the same within the time or in accordance with the specifications of the contract with the state, it shall be the duty of the director to give such parties written notice of such failure, and if, after a period of sixty (60) days from the sending of such notice, they shall have failed to proceed with the work, or to conform to the specifications of their contract with the state, unless said parties shall show to the satisfaction of the board good and sufficient reason for such delay and failure to complete said works or conform to said specifications and demonstrate to the satisfaction of said board their financial ability and intentions to proceed with said work in good faith, the bond and contract of such parties and all work constructed thereunder shall be at once and thereby forfeited to the state, and it shall be the duty of the board at once so to declare and to give notice once each week, for a period of four (4) weeks, in some newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the work is situated, and in one (1) newspaper at the state capital, in like manner and for a like period, of the forfeiture of said contract, and that upon a day fixed, proposals will be received at the office of state lands and investments in the capitol at Cheyenne, for the purchase of the incompleted works and for the completion of said contract; the time for receiving said bids to be at least sixty (60) days subsequent to the issuing of the last notice of forfeiture. The money received from the sale of partially completed works under the provisions of W.S.

36-7-321

, shall first be applied to the expenses incurred by the state in their forfeiture and disposal; secondly, to satisfying the bond; and the surplus, if any exists, shall be paid to the original contractors with the state; provided, however, that the board may, in its discretion, accept from any parties unable for any reason to fulfill the terms of their contract with the state, the full release, relinquishment and surrender of any rights acquired from the state under and by virtue of said contract, and may thereupon abrogate the same and release said parties from the conditions of the said contract and bond, and may proceed in its discretion to enter into a new contract with other parties, if such there be, for the completion of the works so surrendered.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 15; 1899, ch. 6, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 948; C.S. 1910, § 674; C.S. 1920, § 785; R.S. 1931, § 91-717; C.S. 1945, § 24-415; W.S. 1957, § 36-102; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Board entitled to contract water rights priorities. —

The board may, under this section, accept from a defaulting water permittee the right to contract with other permittees as to the priority of water rights under a common permit, as an incident of the board's trustee obligations, and this right of contract is not related to, or in conflict with, the rights granted the board of control by art. 8, § 2, Wyo. Const.Dechert v. Christopulos, 604 P.2d 1039,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 36-7-323.
State not responsible for contractor failures.

Nothing in this act shall be construed as authorizing the board to obligate the state to pay for any work constructed under any contract, or to hold the state in any way responsible to settlers for the failure of contractors to complete the work according to the terms of their contracts with the state.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 16; R.S. 1899, § 949; C.S. 1910, § 675; C.S. 1920, § 786; R.S. 1931, § 91-718; C.S. 1945, § 24-416; W.S. 1957, § 36-103.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note following §

36-7-103

.

§ 36-7-324.
Maps; lands subject to rights-of-way.

The maps in the office of the board of the lands selected under the provisions of this act, shall show the location of the canals or other irrigation works approved in the contract with the board, and all lands filed upon shall be subject to the rights-of-way of such canals or irrigation works; said rights-of-way to embrace the entire width of the canals, and such additional width as may be required for their proper operation and maintenance, the width of such rights-of-way to be specified in the contracts provided for in this act.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 22; R.S. 1899, § 963; C.S. 1910, § 689; C.S. 1920, § 802; R.S. 1931, § 91-734; C.S. 1945, § 24-430; W.S. 1957, § 36-104.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note following §

36-7-103

.

Mineral estate not included in grant. —

The single purpose of a grant under this chapter is for the construction and operation of an irrigation canal, and the mineral estate thereunder is neither included nor contemplated. Batzer Oil Co. v. Ohio Oil Co., 188 F. Supp. 367, 1960 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 4288 (D. Wyo. 1960).

Title to oil and gas underlying land is not included

in right or easement acquired to construct and operate canal. As has been held by the Wyoming supreme court, “The land itself is not sold or granted to the company constructing such irrigation works.” Batzer Oil Co. v. Ohio Oil Co., 188 F. Supp. 367, 1960 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 4288 (D. Wyo. 1960).

And canal and ditch construction companies acquire only rights-of-way.—

This section permits only the inescapable conclusion that fee title to the lands could be acquired only by patents; that only settlers were entitled to receive fee patents from the state; that canal and ditch construction companies could contract for and receive only rights-of-way for the purpose of reclaiming the arid lands and providing water to the settlers thereon. Batzer Oil Co. v. Ohio Oil Co., 188 F. Supp. 367, 1960 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 4288 (D. Wyo. 1960).

§ 36-7-325.
Inspection of completed systems; application for patent.

Whenever any person, firm or corporation constructing an irrigation system to reclaim lands under the Carey Act, shall notify the director that such irrigation system is completed, and that an ample supply of water is being delivered in a substantial ditch or canal to the lands included in such segregation, or any unit of such lands, the director shall cause an inspection to be made of such constructed system, and if he finds that said irrigation system has been constructed in a substantial manner, and in accordance with the plans and specifications agreed upon, and that an ample supply of water is being delivered to such lands in a substantial ditch or canal, he shall immediately apply to the United States government for patent to such lands, and shall submit to the interior department, proof of the reclamation of such lands.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 117, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 781; R.S. 1931, § 91-713; C.S. 1945, § 24-411; W.S. 1957, § 36-105; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

Carey Act. —

See note following chapter heading.

§ 36-7-326.
Assessments for operation; failure to pay; enforcement of lien; costs and fees; injunction bond.

Companies, associations, or corporations operating or controlling irrigation systems, ditches, or reservoirs or other devices for the distribution of water for irrigation shall be authorized to levy and collect such reasonable and necessary assessments for the cost of operation, maintenance, repairs and improvements of such irrigation systems, ditches or reservoirs, and for the purpose of repaying money borrowed for such purposes, as may be authorized by a majority of the members of such companies, or associations, or fixed in the manner provided by the bylaws of such corporation. Payment of such assessments shall be the necessary requisite for the use of such reservoirs, irrigation systems or ditches for the storage or conveyance of water for the lands deeded or described in contracts for or deeds to proportionate interests in such reservoirs, irrigation systems and ditches upon which assessments are made, and in the event such assessments remain due and unpaid more than ten (10) days after the date fixed as the date of payment for the purpose, such companies, associations and corporations are authorized to close down any headgate or other diverting or measuring device used by any delinquent, or by any person in possession of or using such lands, and to refuse to allow the use of such reservoirs, irrigation systems and ditches for the purpose of storing water for or conveying water to the lands of such delinquents and refuse such delinquents the right to vote at any meeting of such company, association, or corporation, until such repair or maintenance assessment shall have been paid. Such companies, associations and corporations shall have a lien upon the proportionate interest in such reservoirs, irrigation systems and ditches, which shall become a first lien upon the lands deeded or described in contracts for or deeds to such proportionate interests for the amount of any unpaid assessments which may be enforced in a court of competent jurisdiction, as in the case of other liens. In all suits or actions to obtain a judgment on such account and to enforce the lien, when the plaintiff or complainant shall obtain judgment or decree, the costs, together with twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for attorney’s fees, shall be taxed or recovered from the adverse party. No restraining order, or order of injunction shall be issued against any such company, association or corporation unless applicant for same shall file a sufficient bond conditioned upon the immediate payment of all delinquent assessments if such shall be found by a competent court to be reasonable and just. This act [section] shall include all lands under any of the above named systems if water has been used or is being used in any one irrigation season and providing that water is in said canal, reservoir or ditches, subject to use of owners.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 160, § 5; C.S. 1910, § 679; Laws 1917, ch. 55, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 792; R.S. 1931, § 91-724; C.S. 1945, § 24-420; W.S. 1957, § 36-106.

Right to lien. —

Under this section, irrigation company was entitled to lien for delinquent assessments on interests represented by unsold water contracts, as well as by contracts disposed of. Bench Canal Co. v. Sullivan, 39 Wyo. 345, 271 P. 221,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1928).

Section contemplates that parties subject to assessments have water available

for their use. Laramie Rivers Co. v. Watson, 69 Wyo. 333, 241 P.2d 1080,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1952).

Lien arising from assessments did not attach to mineral estate

which had been severed from the surface estate before the assessments thereon were made, since, after severance, the two estates, owned separately, were held by separate and distinct titles. Ohio Oil Co. v. Wyoming Agency, 63 Wyo. 187, 179 P.2d 773,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1947).

And purchaser at sheriff's sale acquired no interest in mineralestate. —

A purchaser at a sheriff's sale, held pursuant to a judgment enforcing a lien on a surface estate, acquired no interest in the mineral estate which had been severed from the surface estate before the assessments were made thereon from which the lien arose. Ohio Oil Co. v. Wyoming Agency, 63 Wyo. 187, 179 P.2d 773,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1947).

Estoppel. —

Irrigation company was estopped by its assistant secretary's statement to prospective purchaser that there was no unpaid assessment against land. Seaman v. Big Horn Canal Ass'n, 29 Wyo. 391, 213 P. 938,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1923).

In proceedings to sell property of irrigation company to satisfy judgments,

it is assumed that assessments against lands provided by this section were collected, but were insufficient to pay judgment and expenses, and where company remained liable for half of claims itself, necessity for sale of property was shown. State ex rel. Avenius v. Tidball, 35 Wyo. 496, 252 P. 499,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1927).